Alaska, session 34, HB84.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 24.10.110 is amended to read: 06 Sec. 24.10.110. Additional allowances. The Alaska Legislative Council 07 shall adopt a policy entitling a [IN ADDITION, EACH] member of the legislature 08 [IS ENTITLED] to an annual allowance [PRESCRIBED IN ACCORDANCE WITH 09 AS 39.23] for postage, stationery, stenographic services, and other expenses. 10 * Sec. 2. AS 24.10.130(c) is amended to read: 11 (c) The Alaska Legislative Council shall adopt a policy in accordance with (b) 12 of this section [AND AS 39.23.540(d)] regarding reimbursement for moving expenses 13 and payment of a per diem allowance. The policy must set conditions for the 14 reimbursement for moving expenses and payment of per diem and prescribe the 01 amounts of reimbursement adapted to the special needs of the legislative branch as 02 determined by the council. 03 * Sec. 3. AS 39.23.500(c) is amended to read: 04 (c) The commission shall meet at the call of the chair. Notice of a meeting 05 shall be mailed to each member at least 20 days before the date scheduled for the 06 meeting and posted on the Alaska Online Public Notice System at least five days 07 before the date scheduled for the meeting. 08 * Sec. 4. AS 39.23.500(d) is amended to read: 09 (d) The commission shall meet at least twice to discuss the [ITS] findings and 10 recommendations contained in [AT LEAST TWICE BEFORE SUBMITTING] its 11 final reports or amended reports before submitting the reports [REPORT] to the 12 presiding officers of each house of the legislature and the governor. 13 * Sec. 5. AS 39.23.500 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 14 (f) An action taken contrary to the notice or meeting requirements of (c) and 15 (d) of this section is voidable under AS 44.62.310(f). 16 * Sec. 6. AS 39.23 is amended by adding a new section to read: 17 Sec. 39.23.535. Policy and purpose. The commission shall recommend an 18 equitable rate and form of compensation for members of the legislature, the governor, 19 the lieutenant governor, and each principal department head to attract and retain 20 talented, capable individuals to serve in the highest leadership roles of the state, roles 21 that guide the state's prosperity and welfare today and into the future. 22 * Sec. 7. AS 39.23.540(a) is amended to read: 23 (a) The commission shall review the salaries, benefits, and allowances of 24 members of the legislature, the governor, the lieutenant governor, and each principal 25 executive department head and prepare reports [A REPORT] on its findings [AT 26 LEAST] once every two years [, BUT NOT MORE FREQUENTLY THAN EVERY 27 YEAR]. The commission shall notify the legislature that the reports are [REPORT 28 IS] available. 29 * Sec. 8. AS 39.23.540(c) is amended to read: 30 (c) By November 1 of every odd-numbered year [15], the commission shall 31 prepare its preliminary findings and recommendations for compensation of state 01 officers that is reasonable and equitable. The commission shall give reasonable public 02 notice of its preliminary findings and recommendations, solicit public comments, and 03 give due regard to the public comments [,] before submitting the final reports [A 04 FINAL REPORT] under (d) of this section. 05 * Sec. 9. AS 39.23.540(d) is amended to read: 06 (d) The commission shall make available to the governor and presiding 07 officers of each house of the legislature two final reports [A FINAL REPORT] of its 08 findings and recommendations, one report as to the rate and form of compensation, 09 benefits, and allowances for legislators, and one report as to the rate and form of 10 compensation, benefits, and allowances for the governor, the lieutenant governor, 11 and each principal executive department head, during the first 15 [10] days of a 12 legislative session. Subject to AS 24.10.130(b) and (g) of this section, and unless a bill 13 disapproving all the recommendations for all officers listed in a report [THIS 14 SECTION] is enacted into law within 75 [60] days after the recommendations are 15 submitted to the governor and presiding officers of each house of the legislature, a 16 recommendation as to the compensation, benefits, and allowances for 17 (1) a legislator has the force of law and becomes effective on the first 18 day of the next legislature [REGULAR LEGISLATIVE SESSION]; and 19 (2) the governor, the lieutenant governor, and each principal executive 20 department head has the force of law and becomes effective on the first day of the 21 fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the recommendation is submitted. 22 * Sec. 10. AS 39.23.540(e) is amended to read: 23 (e) The commission may amend a [PREPARE AMENDMENTS TO THE] 24 report submitted under (d) of this section on or before March 15 and shall notify the 25 governor and the presiding officer of each house of the legislature that the 26 amended report is [AMENDMENTS ARE] available. An amended report under 27 this subsection does not change the time for disapproval by the legislature under 28 (d) of this section. 29 * Sec. 11. AS 39.23.540(g) is amended to read: 30 (g) A recommendation in a final report under this section increasing the 31 compensation, benefits, and allowances of a public officer is not effective unless all 01 recommended increases included in that [THE FINAL] report [UNDER (d) OF THIS 02 SECTION] are fully funded by appropriations. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.